public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.old.verb.rules.aff
SFX a2 Y 118
SFX a2 0 ave-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 aƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 emo/P2 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 imo/P2 er
SFX a2 0 iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a2 0 on/P2 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 à-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 àe-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 àeƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 àveƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 íe-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 íeƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 íseƚo/I9 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 ónmeƚo/P8 [aei]r
SFX a2 ar e-ƚo/A1 [^i]ar
SFX a2 ar emo/P2 ar
SFX a2 ar erave-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eraƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eremo/P2 ar
SFX a2 ar erà-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eràe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eràeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eràveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar erémomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar erémoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar eríe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eríeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eríseƚo/I9 ar
SFX a2 ar eve-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a2 ar à/P2 ar
SFX a2 ar àe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar àeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar àmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àndomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àndoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àntomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àntoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àrmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar è-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar èmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar èƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar é-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar ée-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar éeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar émomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar émoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éndomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éndoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éntomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éntoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar ónmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 e meƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 e ƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 er arave-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er araƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aremo/P2 er
SFX a2 er aron/P2 er
SFX a2 er arà-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aràe-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aràeƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aràveƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er arémomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er arémoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er aríe-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aríeƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aríseƚo/I9 er
SFX a2 er arónmeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er imo/P2 er
SFX a2 er iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a2 er iƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er àndomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er àndoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er àntomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er àntoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er é-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er émeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er émomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er émoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éndomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éndoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éntomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éntoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er érmeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éveƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er ímeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er ónmeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 iar e-ƚo/A1 iar
SFX a2 ier e-ƚo/A1 ier
SFX a2 io i/P2 io
SFX a2 ioe eƚo/A1 ioe
SFX a2 ir e-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX a2 ir ímeƚo/P8 ir
SFX a2 ir írmeƚo/P8 ir
SFX a2 ir íveƚo/A1 ir
SFX a2 o a/P2 o
SFX a2 o e/P2 o
SFX a2 o i/P2 [^i]o
SFX a2 oe ameƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe aƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe emeƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe eƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe imeƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe iƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 r -ƚo/A1 [^i]er
SFX a2 r ve-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 r ƚo/A1 er


# vèrbi '-er/'-ar
# themeT1 + [ea]r/b0b1b2P0P1P2
# themeT5 + rò/b0b1b2I0
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0
SFX b0 Y 161
SFX b0 0 e [ea]r
SFX b0 0 me/P6 [ea]r
SFX b0 0 mene/P6 [ae]r
SFX b0 0 ne/I1 [ea]r	
SFX b0 erò iede/I4 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò iege/I4 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò ime/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò imo/P0I0 erò
SFX b0 erò ione/I1 [^cijɉñ]erò	
SFX b0 erò ionme/P6 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò isen/I0 erò
SFX b0 erò isene/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò isense erò
SFX b0 erò isensi erò
SFX b0 erò isiede/I4 erò
SFX b0 erò isiege/I4 erò
SFX b0 erò ision/I0 erò
SFX b0 erò isione/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò isionse erò
SFX b0 erò isié/I4 erò
SFX b0 erò ison/I0 erò
SFX b0 erò isone/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò isonse erò
SFX b0 erò ivene/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò ivione/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò iviéu/I5 erò
SFX b0 erò ivone/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò iéu/I5 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò iónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò on/P0I0 erò
SFX b0 erò one/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò onme/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò àndome/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò àndomene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò àntome/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò àntomene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò éa/P3I0I4 erò
SFX b0 erò éane/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò éau/I5 erò
SFX b0 erò ée/I0 erò
SFX b0 erò éene/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò éi/I0I2I4 erò
SFX b0 erò éimo/I0 erò
SFX b0 erò éimoe/I1 erò
SFX b0 erò éitu/I3 erò	
SFX b0 erò émene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò émoe/I1 erò
SFX b0 erò émome/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò émomene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò éndome/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò éndomene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò éntome/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò éntomene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò éo/I0 erò
SFX b0 erò éone/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò érmene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò ésimo erò
SFX b0 erò éu/I5 erò
SFX b0 erò évane/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò évau/I5 erò
SFX b0 erò évene/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò évimoe/I1 erò
SFX b0 erò évitu/I3 erò	
SFX b0 erò évone/I1 erò	
SFX b0 erò í/P3I4 erò
SFX b0 erò ímene/P6 erò
SFX b0 erò ímoe/I1 erò
SFX b0 erò íu/I5 erò
SFX b0 erò ónmene/P6 erò
SFX b0 rò de erò
SFX b0 rò ge erò
SFX b0 rò me/P6 erò
SFX b0 rò mo/P0I0 erò
SFX b0 rò n/I0 erò
SFX b0 rò ne/I1 erò	
SFX b0 rò nse erò
SFX b0 rò nsi erò
SFX b0 ò ane/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò atu/I3 ò	
SFX b0 ò ave/P3 ò	
SFX b0 ò emo/P0I0 ò
SFX b0 ò en/I0 ò
SFX b0 ò ene/I1 ò	 
SFX b0 ò ense ò
SFX b0 ò ensi ò
SFX b0 ò esiu/I5 ò	 
SFX b0 ò imo/P0I0 ò
SFX b0 ò ion/P0I0 ò
SFX b0 ò ione/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò ionme/P6 ò
SFX b0 ò isen/I0 ò
SFX b0 ò isene/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò isense ò
SFX b0 ò isensi ò
SFX b0 ò ision/I0 ò
SFX b0 ò isione/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò isionse ò
SFX b0 ò isié/I4 ò	
SFX b0 ò isiéu/I5 ò	 
SFX b0 ò ison/I0 ò
SFX b0 ò isone/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò isonse ò
SFX b0 ò ié/I4 ò	
SFX b0 ò iéu/I5 ò	 
SFX b0 ò iónmene/P6 ò
SFX b0 ò me/P6 erò
SFX b0 ò on/P0I0 ò
SFX b0 ò one/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò onme/P6 ò
SFX b0 ò à/P3I0I2 ò
SFX b0 ò àe/P3 ò	
SFX b0 ò è/I0 ò
SFX b0 ò ène/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò émoe/I1 ò
SFX b0 ò émome/P6 ò
SFX b0 ò émomene/P6 ò
SFX b0 ò ésimoe/I1 ò
SFX b0 ò ésitu/I3 ò	
SFX b0 ò éu/I5 ò
SFX b0 ò í/I4 ò
SFX b0 ò ía/I0I2 ò
SFX b0 ò èe/P3I0I2 ò
SFX b0 ò íane/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò íatu/I3 ò	
SFX b0 ò íe/P3I0 ò
SFX b0 ò íene/I1 ò	
SFX b0 ò ímoe/I1 ò
SFX b0 ò íu/I5 ò
SFX b0 ò ónmene/P6 ò

# vèrbi '-er/'-ar
# themeT1 + [ea]r/b0b1b2P0P1P2
# themeT5 + rò/b0b1b2I0
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0
SFX b1 Y 60
SFX b1 0 me/P7 [ea]r
SFX b1 0 melo/P7 [ae]r
SFX b1 erò ilo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò imo/P1 erò
SFX b1 erò ionme/P7 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b1 erò iónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b1 erò on/P1 erò
SFX b1 erò àndolo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò àndomelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò àntolo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò àntomelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò é-lo/A1 erò
SFX b1 erò ée-lo/A1 erò
SFX b1 erò éelo/A1 erò
SFX b1 erò émelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò émolo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò émomelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò éndolo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò éndomelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò éntolo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò éntomelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò érmelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò évelo/A1 erò
SFX b1 erò ímelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò onme/P7 erò
SFX b1 erò ónmelo/P7 erò
SFX b1 rò lo/P7 erò
SFX b1 rò mo/P1 erò
SFX b1 rò nt erò
SFX b1 rò s erò
SFX b1 rò st erò
SFX b1 rò ve-lo/A1 erò
SFX b1 rò velo/A1 erò
SFX b1 ò alo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò ave-lo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò emo/P1 ò
SFX b1 ò imo/P1 ò
SFX b1 ò ion/P1 ò
SFX b1 ò ionme/P7 ò
SFX b1 ò iónmelo/P7 ò
SFX b1 ò me/P7 erò
SFX b1 ò on/P1 ò
SFX b1 ò à-lo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò àe-lo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò àelo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò àvelo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò émolo/P7 ò
SFX b1 ò émomelo/P7 ò
SFX b1 ò íe-lo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò íelo/A1 ò
SFX b1 ò íselo/I8 ò
SFX b1 ò onme/P7 ò
SFX b1 ò ónmelo/P7 ò

# vèrbi '-er/'-ar
# themeT1 + [ea]r/b0b1b2P0P1P2
# themeT5 + rò/b0b1b2I0
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0
SFX b2 Y 51
SFX b2 0 meƚo/P8 [ae]r
SFX b2 erò imo/P2 erò
SFX b2 erò iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b2 erò iƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò on/P2 erò
SFX b2 erò àndomeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò àndoƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò àntomeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò àntoƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò é-ƚo/A1 erò
SFX b2 erò ée-ƚo/A1 erò
SFX b2 erò éeƚo/A1 erò
SFX b2 erò émeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò émomeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò émoƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò éndomeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò éndoƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò éntomeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò éntoƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò érmeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò éveƚo/A1 erò
SFX b2 erò ímeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 erò ónmeƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 rò mo/P2 erò
SFX b2 rò ve-ƚo/A1 erò
SFX b2 rò veƚo/A1 erò
SFX b2 rò ƚo/P8 erò
SFX b2 ò ave-ƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò aƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò emo/P2 ò
SFX b2 ò imo/P2 ò
SFX b2 ò ion/P2 ò
SFX b2 ò iónmeƚo/P8 ò
SFX b2 ò on/P2 ò
SFX b2 ò à-ƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò àe-ƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò àeƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò àveƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò émomeƚo/P8 ò
SFX b2 ò émoƚo/P8 ò
SFX b2 ò íe-ƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò íeƚo/A1 ò
SFX b2 ò íseƚo/I9 ò
SFX b2 ò ónmeƚo/P8 ò
